Washington statutes.
RCW 15.125.050

Cannabis producer, processor, and retailer information—Exemption from public inspection and copying.

Information about cannabis producers, cannabis processors, and cannabis retailers otherwise exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW is also exempt from public inspection and copying if submitted to or used by the department.

[ 2022 c 16 s 18; 2017 c 317 s 22.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Application—2017 c 317: See notes following RCW 69.50.325.